src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Sublexica for Noun

## Even-syllable stems

### 2syll stems

LEXICON MUORRA  Standard even stems with cg (note Q1). OBS: Nouns with invisible 3>2 cg (as busºsa) go to this lexicon.

* # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *kártta:* `kártta+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kártajn:* `kártta+N+Sg+Com`

LEXICON TÁLLA  Same as MUORRA, but for words with º (extra length). Not in MUORRA because of other err/orths

LEXICON ALMME  Same as MUORRA, but with special -LASJ derivation. For noun that have strong grade -lasj. "Almmelasj" instead of "almálasj" which is Err/Orth-taged..

LEXICON NOADE  Even stem without cg. OBS: No nouns with invisible 3>2 cg (as busºsa) in this lexicon. OBS: Because of denominal nouns taking a weak grade stem, entries in grade 3 are given the gradation mark º in order to prevent alternation to weak grade. We should consider creating a separate denominal nouns lexicon for NOADE instead.

* låda # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *låda:* `låda+N+Sg+Nom`
* *lådas:* `låda+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON KÁFFA  For even-syll words with cg cg III-I: káf'fa-káfav, jáf'fo-jáfo. No vowelchanges jet, need new twolc code.

* káffa # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *káffa:* `káffa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *gáffa:* `káffa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *gáfas:* `káffa+N+Sg+Ela`
* *káfas:* `káffa+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON LINNJA  Only for the loan word "linnja". Because it's a loan word, the "nnj" is pronounced "nn-j", and therefore does not behave as the regular lule sami "nj" sound and therefore it doesn't follow the rule that makes a:á in 1. grade with short vowel in first syllable (It isn't as linnja-linjáv or birás-birrasav). This word is therefore sub taged. Norwegian/Swedish words with a short "i" followed by two different consonants are assimilated to lule sami in different manners accoring to the consonants in question, but the word is always on grade III (Morén-Duolljá 2014). Both err/orth and correct form is part of this lexicon. 

* linja # Even-syllable test examples:*

LEXICON BOAKSA  Only for word "boaksa". Both boaksa-båvsa and Err/Orth boaksa-båksa are part of lexicon.

LEXICON SÁMEGIEL  Compounds on -giella, with short -giel as middle compound (sámegielåhpadiddje)

* rievsakgiella # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *rievsakgiella:* `rievsakgiella+N+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON AHKA  Words like tjerastahka, with short compound form

* báládahka # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *báládahka:* `báládahka+N+Sg+Nom`
* *báládak:* `báládahka+N+Sg+Nom`
* *báládagáv:* `báládahka+N+Sg+Acc`

LEXICON DARRHA  Only for "darrha" or compounds that end on "darrha".

* báktedarrha # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *báktedarrha:* `báktedarrha+N+Sg+Nom`
* *báktedarháv:* `báktedarrha+N+Sg+Acc`

### Nouns with comparatives

LEXICON GÁDDE  2 syllable stems with cg (note Q1) with comparatives, like MUORRA

* boassjo # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *boassjo:* `boassjo+N+Sg+Nom`
* *båssjujn:* `boassjo+N+Sg+Com`
* *boassjojn:* `boassjo+N+Sg+Com`
* *boassjop:* `boassjo+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON VUODO  2 syllable stems without cg (note Q1) with comparatives, like NOADE

* låda # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *vuodo:* `vuodo+N+Sg+Nom`
* *vuodos:* `vuodo+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON SJIEVNNJET  Like GAHPER but with comparatives. Odd-syllable C-final noun without cg, no vowchange, no short Ess.

* stiebil # Odd-syllable test examples:*
* *sjievnnjet:* `sjievnnjet+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sjievnnjedis:* `sjievnnjet+N+Sg+Ela`
* *sjievnnjedabbo* `sjievnnje+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`
* *sjievnnjedamos* `sjievnnje+N+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON ÅLGGO  Like MUORRA, but with comparatives. This lexicon was previously without sg ill/ine/elat, but these nouns can be conjugated for regular location cases. However, "adverbs" like ålggot (from outside), nuorttan (at north), oarjas (to south), etc., are more commonly used to denote location/direction (should therefore maybe consider subing the regular location case forms).

* lulle # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *lulle:* `lulle+N+Sg+Nom`
* *lulev:* `lulle+N+Sg+Acc`
* *lulep:* `lulle+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom`

LEXICON MIEHTE  Like MUORRA but no locative/elative/illative sg. Presently no words in this lexica except for err subed nuortto

* nuortto # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *nuortto:* `nuortto+N+Sg+Nom`
* *nuortov:* `nuortto+N+Sg+Acc`

### Plural stems

LEXICON BÅVSÅ  Like MUORRA, only in plural. All, except ganta, juvdá and ávta, have regular, singular stem counterparts.

* båvså # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *båvså:* `båvså+N+Pl+Nom`
* *båvsåjt:* `båvså+N+Pl+Acc`

LEXICON LÅHTSASA  Like GAHPER, only in plural. Without derivations, these should maybe be added. 

### Partially assimilated loanwords. The first part of the word is "citation borrowed" and keeps its norwegian/swedish orthography, only the last two syllables are adapted to sami.

LEXICON MUORRA_LOAN   For loan words that do not fit in a loan word lexicon because of wrong short cmp, or partially assimilated loanwords without separate lexicas (medállja), or for Err/Orths assimilated with cg but with other errors. This lexicon gives no short compound forms. Potential short cmps must therefore be hard coded into the FirstComponent lexicon. This also for compounded words with partially assimilated loan words. Examples of problem words: sirup>siráhppa og stetoskop>stetoskoahppa.

LEXICON MUORRA_LOAN_NO_LASJ   Like MUORRA_LOAN without -lasj derivation. This lexicon is made for Sem/Hum words like økonåvmmå, biolåvggå, agronåvmmå and so on. We don't want agronåvmålasj since it means something else than "agronomisk", the meaning of agronåvmålasj is barely used but messed up with "agronomijjalasj"

LEXICON MUORRA_LOAN_EXTRA_LENGTH   Same as MUORRA_LOAN just for words with º (extra length). 

LEXICON KAFIEDJA_CMP_INFL   Recent loanwords on -edja. Ends on -é in norwegian. Short and long cmp. "Kafea" and "kaféa" are subtaged. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA.

LEXICON ALLEGORIJJA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords ending on -i in NOR/SWE, with long and short compound form. Standardized as-iddja (SWE) and -ijºja (NOR). Previously often assimilated as -ija (or just -ia), but both forms are ungrammatical: Short vowels cannot preceed and follow a single intervocalic consonant. -ija is thus ungrammatical as the short a would be lenghtened to á, like "idja-ijá".

* partijja # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *akademiddja:* `akademijja+N+Sg+Nom`
* *akademijja:* `akademijja+N+Sg+Nom`
* *akademidjas:* `akademijja+N+Sg+Ela`
* *akademijjas:* `akademijja+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TEKSTIJLLA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ijlla with long and short compound-form. . Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* tekstijlla # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *tekstijlla:* `tekstijlla+N+Sg+Nom`
* *tekstijlas:* `tekstijlla+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ASIJLLA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ijlla, from nor and swe words ending on -yl. With long and short compound-form.  Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* asijlla # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *asijlla:* `asijlla+N+Sg+Nom`
* *asijlas:* `asijlla+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON BENSIJNNA  Recent loanwords on -ijnna with long and short compound-form

LEXICON BENSIJNNA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ijnna with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* tamburijnna # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *tamburijnna:* `tamburijnna+N+Sg+Nom`
* *tamburijnas:* `tamburijnna+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MASJIJNNA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -sjijnna with long and short compound-form: -SKIN

* bivtasmasjijnna # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *bivtasmasjijnna:* `bivtasmasjijnna+N+Sg+Nom`
* *bivtasmasjijnas:* `bivtasmasjijnna+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ADJEKTIJVVA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ijvva with long and short compound-form

* datijvva # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *datijvva:* `datijvva+N+Sg+Nom`
* *datijvas:* `datijvva+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PARADIJSSA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -ijssa with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* servijssa # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *servijssa:* `servijssa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *servijsas:* `servijssa+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON TELEFÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -åvnnå with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* persåvnnå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *persåvnnå:* `persåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *persåvnås:* `persåvnnå+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON INSTITUSJÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL   Recent loanwords on -sjåvnnå with long and short compound-form: -TION IN SWEDISH. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* populasjåvnnå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *populasjåvnnå:* `populasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *populasjåvnås:* `populasjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON MISJÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -sjåvnnå with long and short compound-form: -SSION IN SWEDISH. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* sesjåvnnå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *sesjåvnnå:* `sesjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *sesjåvnås:* `sesjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PENSJÅVNNÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -sjåvnnå with long and short compound-form: -SION IN SWEDISH. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* suspensjåvnnå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *suspensjåvnnå:* `suspensjåvnnå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *suspensjåvnås:* `suspensjåvnnå+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON PARTISIHPPA_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords from swe -cip and nor -sipp, becoming -sihppa in Norway, both -sijppa and -sihppa are used in Sweden (Particip vs partisipp). Short and long compound-form. 

* partisihppa # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *partisihppa:* `partisihppa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *partisihpas:* `partisihppa+N+Sg+Ela`
* *partisijppa:* `partisihppa+N+Sg+Nom`
* *partisijpas:* `partisihppa+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON ALKOHÅVLLÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -åvllå with long and short compound-form. The old stadarization form "alkohola" is sub taged. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

* parabåvllå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *parabåvllå:* `parabåvllå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *parabåvlås:* `parabåvllå+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON AGRONÅVMMÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords on -åvmma with long and short compound-form. -lasj derivation is error taged. The old stadarization form  -oma that does not follow lulesami rules is sub taged.

* agronåvmmå # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *agronåvmmå:* `agronåvmmå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *agronåvmås:* `agronåvmmå+N+Sg+Ela`

LEXICON DEMAGÅVGGÅ_CMP_INFL  Recent loanwords ending on -og with long and short compound form. Assimilated to smj as -åvggå. -lasj derivation is error taged. The old stadarization -oga that does not follow lulesami rules is sub taged.

* pedagoga # Even-syllable test examples:*
* *pedagåvggå:* `pedagåvggå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *pedagåvggå:* `pedagåvggå+N+Sg+Nom`
* *pedagåvgås:* `pedagåvggå+N+Sg+Ela`
